Utah statutes.
13-26-4.   Exemptions from registration.
(1)  In any enforcement action initiated by the division, the person claiming
an exemption has the burden of proving that the person is entitled to the
exemption.
(2)  The following are exempt from the requirements of this chapter except for
the requirements of Sections 13-26-8 and 13-26-11:
(a)  a broker, agent, dealer, or sales professional licensed under the
licensure laws of this state, when soliciting sales within the scope of his
license;
(b)  the solicitation of sales by:
(i)  a public utility that is regulated under Title 54 or by an affiliate of
the utility;
(ii)  a newspaper of general circulation;
(iii)  a solicitation of sales made by a broadcaster licensed by any state or
federal authority;
(iv)  a nonprofit organization if no part of the net earnings from the sale
inures to the benefit of any  member, officer, trustee, or serving board
member of the organization, or individual, or family member of an individual,
holding a position of authority or trust in the organization; and
(v)  a person who periodically publishes and delivers a catalog of the
solicitor's merchandise to prospective purchasers, if the catalog:
(A)  contains the price and a written description or illustration of each item
offered for sale;
(B)  includes the business address of the solicitor;
(C)  includes at least 24 pages of written material and illustrations;
(D)  is distributed in more than one state; and
(E)  has an annual circulation by mailing of not less than 250,000;
(c)  any publicly-traded corporation registered with the Securities and
Exchange Commission, or any subsidiary of the corporation;
(d)  the solicitation of any depository institution as defined in Section
7-1-103, a subsidiary of a depository institution, personal property broker,
securities broker, investment adviser, consumer finance lender, or insurer
subject to regulation by an official agency of this state or the United
States;
(e)  the solicitation by a person soliciting only the sale of telephone
services to be provided by the person or the person's employer;
(f)  the solicitation of a person relating to a transaction regulated by the
Commodities Futures Trading Commission, if:
(i)  the person is registered with or temporarily licensed by the commission
to conduct that activity under the Commodity Exchange Act; and
(ii)  the registration or license has not expired or been suspended or
revoked;
(g)  the solicitation of a contract for the maintenance or repair of goods
previously purchased from the person:
(i)  who is making the solicitation; or
(ii)  on whose behalf the solicitation is made;
(h)  the solicitation of previous customers of the business on whose behalf
the call is made if the person making the call:
(i)  does not offer any premium in conjunction with a sale or offer;
(ii)  is not selling an investment or an opportunity for an investment that is
not registered with any state or federal authority; and
(iii)  is not regularly engaged in telephone sales;
(i)  the solicitation of a sale that is an isolated transaction and not done
in the course of a pattern of repeated transactions of a like nature;
(j)  the solicitation of a person by a retail business establishment that has
been in operation for at least five years in Utah under the same name as that
used in connection with telemarketing if both of the following occur on a
continuing basis:
(i)  products are displayed and offered for sale at the place of business, or
services are offered for sale and provided at the place of business; and
(ii)  a majority of the seller's business involves the buyer obtaining the
products or services at the seller's place of business;
(k)  a person primarily soliciting the sale of a magazine or periodical sold
by the publisher or the publisher's agent through a written agreement, or
printed or recorded material through a contractual plan, such as a book or
record club, continuity plan, subscription, standing order arrangement, or
supplement or series arrangement if:
(i)  the seller provides the consumer with a form that the consumer may use to
instruct the seller not to ship the offered merchandise, and the arrangement
is regulated by the Federal Trade Commission trade regulation concerning use
of negative option plans by sellers in commerce; or
(ii) (A)  the seller periodically ships merchandise to a consumer who has
consented in advance to receive the merchandise on a periodic basis; and
(B)  the consumer retains the right to cancel at any time and receive a full
refund for the unused portion; or
(l)  a telephone marketing service company that provides telemarketing sales
services under contract to sellers if:
(i)  it has been doing business regularly with customers in Utah for at least
five years under the same business name and with its principal office in the
same location;
(ii)  at least 75% of its contracts are performed on behalf of persons
exempted from registration under this chapter; and
(iii)  neither the company nor its principals have been enjoined from doing
business or subjected to criminal actions for their business activities in
this or any other state.
